Utah statutes.
53B-9-101.   Legislative findings on higher education for senior citizens -- Legislative intent -- Quarterly registration fee.

(1)  The Legislature finds that substantial benefits would accrue to the state, as well as those directly involved, through making higher education more accessible to senior citizens who generally find themselves with more time for learning but with less funds for such purposes.

(2)  It is intended that an institution of higher education allow Utah residents who have reached 62 years of age to enroll at the institution, in classes for which they may be qualified, on the basis of surplus space in regularly scheduled classes and in accordance with this chapter and implementing rules.  These persons are exempt from tuition and other charges, except for a quarterly registration fee established by the board.

